Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.140.900

Reports to the legislature.

Before January 31st of each year, the University of Washington and Washington State University must report to the ways and means committee of the senate and the capital budget committee of the house of representatives on the financing arrangements entered into under the authority of this chapter.

[ 2002 c 151 s 7.]